California statutes. Civil Code
(2) All taxes, bonds, and assessments, or any of them, which were payable at the date of the acquisition of such property by the tenant, excepting, however, interest accruing
thereon from the date of the acquisition of such property by the tenant; and all such sums shall be a charge against the principal.

(b) Upon the sale, surrender, or other disposition of a bond, debenture, note, or other evidence of an indebtedness, voluntarily created, or of a certificate of deposit evidencing the deposit of any such instrument with a protective or reorganization committee, or of stock or other security received through paricipation in the enforcement of such obligation or the foreclosure of the security therefor, upon which bond or other obligation there is overdue unpaid interest which accrued after the establishment of the principal, the proceeds realized upon such sale, surrender, or other disposition, after repayment (1) of expenses incurred in connection therewith and (2) of any sums paid to protect or preserve such security, shall be divided pro rata between income and principal, computing interest at the rate specified
in such obligation. The amount allocable to income shall in no case exceed the interest accrued and unpaid on the original obligation up to the time of such sale or other disposition or, where another security has been received in lieu of the original obligation, the income which would have accrued on the latter up to such time, less income received from the original or the substituted security. The terms sale, surrender, or other disposition, as above used, shall include compromise, settlement, accord and satisfaction, and similar arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 193.)
-------------------------------------------

731.15.

(a) All ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the principal or with its administration and management, including regularly recurring taxes assessed against any portion of the principal, water rates, premiums on insurance taken upon the estates of both tenant and remainderman, interest on mortgages on the principal, ordinary repairs, compensation of assistants and court costs on regular accountings, except attorneys’ fees, shall be paid out of income. But such expenses where incurred in disposing of, or as carrying charges on, unproductive property as defined in Section 731.13, shall be paid out of principal, subject to the provisions of
subdivision (b) of Section 731.13. Attorneys’ fees for ordinary or current services shall be paid one-half out of income; one-half out of principal or in such other proportion as the court may direct.

(b) Attorneys’ fees and other costs incurred in maintaining or defending any action to protect the property or assure the title thereof, unless due to the fault or cause of the tenant, costs of, or assessments for, improvements to property forming part of the principal, brokers’ commissions, title charges, and other costs incurred in connection with purchasing, selling, or leasing property, or investing or reinvesting principal, and all other expenses, except as specified in subdivision (a) of this section, shall be paid out of principal. Any tax levied by any authority, federal, state, or foreign, upon profit or gain defined under the terms of subdivision (b) of Section 731.05 shall be paid out of principal, notwithstanding such tax may be
denominated a tax upon income by the taxing authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 193.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Rights of Owners [732. - 733.]

732.

The owner of a thing owns also all its products and accessions.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

When, in consequence of a valid limitation of a future interest, there is a suspension of the power of alienation or of the ownership during the continuation of which the income is undisposed of, and no valid direction for its accumulation is given, such income belongs to the persons presumptively entitled to the next eventual interest.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Termination of Ownership [739. - 742.]

739.

A future interest, depending on the contingency of the death of any person without successors, heirs, issue, or children, is defeated by the birth of a posthumous child of such person, capable of taking by succession.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

740.

A future interest may be defeated in any manner or by any act or means which the party creating such interest provided for or authorized in the creation thereof; nor is a future interest, thus liable to be defeated, to be on that ground adjudged void in its creation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

No future interest can be defeated or barred by any alienation or other act of the owner of the intermediate or precedent interest, nor by any destruction of such precedent interest by forfeiture, surrender, merger, or otherwise, except as provided by the next section, or where a forfeiture is imposed by statute as a penalty for the violation thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

No future interest, valid in its creation, is defeated by the determination of the precedent interest before the happening of the contingency on which the future interest is limited to take effect; but should such contingency afterwards happen, the future interest takes effect in the same manner and to the same extent as if the precedent interest had continued to the same period.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. GENERAL DEFINITIONS [748. - 749.]

748.

The income of property, as the term is used in this Part of the Code, includes the rents and profits of real property, the interest of money, dividends upon stock, and other produce of personal property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

749.

The delivery of the grant, where a limitation, condition, or future interest is created by grant, and the death of the testator, where it is created by will, is to be deemed the time of the creation of the limitation, condition, or interest, within the meaning of this Part of the Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. REAL OR IMMOVABLE PROPERTY [[755.] - 945.5.]



  TITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [[755.] - [755.]]

[755.]

Section Seven Hundred and Fifty-five. Real property within the State is governed by the law of this State, except where the title is in the United States.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. ESTATES IN REAL PROPERTY [761. - 817.4.]



  CHAPTER 1. Estates in General [761. - 784.]

761.

Estates in real property, in respect to the duration of their enjoyment are either:

l. Estates of inheritance or perpetual estates;

2. Estates for life;

3. Estates for years; or,

4. Estates at will.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[762.]

Section Seven Hundred and Sixty-two. Every estate of inheritance is a fee, and every such estate, when not defeasible or conditional, is a fee simple or an absolute fee.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

763.

Estates tail are abolished, and every estate which would be at common law adjudged to be a fee tail is a fee simple; and if no valid remainder is limited thereon, is a fee simple absolute.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

764.

Where a remainder in fee is limited upon any estate, which would by the common law be adjudged a fee tail, such remainder is valid as a contingent limitation upon a fee, and vests in possession on the death of the first taker, without issue living at the time of his death.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

765.

Estates of inheritance and for life are called estates of freehold; estates for years are chattels real; and estates at will are chattel interests, but are not subject to enforcement of a money judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

[766.]

Section Seven Hundred and Sixty-six. An estate during the life of a third person, whether limited to heirs or otherwise, is a freehold.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

767.

A future estate may be limited by the act of the party to commence in possession at a future day, either without the intervention of a precedent estate, or on the termination, by lapse of time or otherwise, of a precedent estate created at the same time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

768.

A reversion is the residue of an estate left by operation of law in the grantor or his successors, or in the successors of a testator, commencing in possession on the determination of a particular estate granted or devised.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

769.

When a future estate, other than a reversion, is dependent on a precedent estate, it may be called a remainder, and may be created and transferred by that name.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

773.

Subject to the rules of this title, and of Part 1 of this division, a freehold estate, as well as a chattel real, may be created to commence at a future day; an estate for life may be created in a term of years, and a remainder limited thereon; a remainder of a freehold or chattel real, either contingent or vested, may be created, expectant on the determination of a term of years; and a fee may be limited on a fee, upon a contingency, which, if it should occur, must happen within the period prescribed by the statutory rule against perpetuities in Article 2 (commencing with Section 21205) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 11 of the Probate
Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 156, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

778.

A remainder may be limited on a contingency which, in case it should happen, will operate to abridge or determine the precedent estate; and every such remainder is to be deemed a conditional limitation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

779.

When a remainder is limited to the heirs, or heirs of the body, of a person to whom a life estate in the same property is given, the persons who, on the termination of the life estate, are the successors or heirs of the body of the owner for life, are entitled to take by virtue of the remainder so limited to them, and not as mere successors of the owner for life.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

780.

When a remainder on an estate for life or for years is not limited on a contingency defeating or avoiding such precedent estate, it is to be deemed intended to take effect only on the death of the first taker, or the expiration, by lapse of time, of such term of years.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

781.

A general or special power of appointment does not prevent the vesting of a future estate limited to take effect in case such power is not executed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

782.

(a) Any provision in any deed of real property in California, whether executed before or after the effective date of this section, that purports to restrict the right of any persons to sell, lease, rent, use, or occupy the property to persons having any characteristic listed in subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 12955 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926, 12926.1,
subdivision (m) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 12955 and Section 12955.2 of the Government Code, by providing for payment of a penalty, forfeiture, reverter, or otherwise, is void.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to familial status, subdivision (a) shall not be construed to apply to housing for older persons, as defined in Section 12955.9 of the Government Code. With respect to familial status, nothing in subdivision (a) shall be construed to affect Sections 51.2, 51.3, 51.4, 51.10, 51.11, and 799.5 of this code, relating to housing for senior citizens. Subdivision (d) of Section 51, Section 4760, and Section 6714 of this code, and subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) of Section 12955 of the Government Code shall apply to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 22) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 10.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

782.5.

(a) Any deed or other written instrument that relates to title to real property, or any written covenant, condition, or restriction annexed or made a part of, by reference or otherwise, any deed or instrument that relates to title to real property, which contains any provision that purports to forbid, restrict, or condition the right of any person or persons to sell, buy, lease, rent, use, or occupy
the property on account of any basis listed in subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 12955 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926, 12926.1, subdivision (m) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 12955, and Section 12955.2 of the Government Code, with respect to any person or persons, shall be deemed to be revised to omit that provision.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to familial status, subdivision (a) shall not be construed to apply to housing for older persons, as defined in Section 12955.9 of the Government Code. With respect to familial status, nothing in subdivision (a) shall be construed to affect Sections 51.2, 51.3, 51.4, 51.10, 51.11, and 799.5 of this code, relating to housing for senior citizens. Subdivision (d) of Section 51, Section 4760, and Section 6714 of this code, and subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) of Section 12955 of the Government Code shall apply to subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit or expand the powers of a court to reform a deed or other written instrument.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 23) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 11.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

783.

A condominium is an estate in real property described in Section 4125 or 6542. A condominium may, with respect to the duration of its enjoyment, be either (1) an estate of inheritance or perpetual estate, (2) an estate for life, (3) an estate for years, such as a leasehold or a subleasehold, or (4) any combination of the foregoing.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 12.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

783.1.

In a stock cooperative, as defined in Section 4190 or 6566, both the separate interest, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4185 or in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 6564, and the correlative interest in the stock cooperative corporation, however designated, are interests in real property.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 25) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 13.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

784.

“Restriction,” when used in a statute that incorporates this section by reference, means a limitation on, or provision affecting, the use of real property in a deed, declaration, or other instrument, whether in the form of a covenant, equitable servitude, condition subsequent, negative easement, or other form of restriction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Termination of Estates [789. - 793.]

789.

A tenancy or other estate at will, however created, may be terminated by the landlord’s giving notice in writing to the tenant, in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to remove from the premises within a period of not less than 30 days, to be specified in the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

789.3.

(a) A landlord shall not with intent to terminate the occupancy under any lease or other tenancy or estate at will, however created, of property used by a tenant as his residence willfully cause, directly or indirectly, the interruption or termination of any utility service furnished the tenant, including, but not limited to, water, heat, light, electricity, gas, telephone, elevator, or refrigeration, whether or not the utility service is under the control of the landlord.

(b) In addition, a landlord shall not, with intent to terminate the occupancy under any lease or other tenancy or
estate at will, however created, of property used by a tenant as his or her residence, willfully:

(1) Prevent the tenant from gaining reasonable access to the property by changing the locks or using a bootlock or by any other similar method or device;

(2) Remove outside doors or windows; or

(3) Remove from the premises the tenant’s personal property, the furnishings, or any other items without the prior written consent of the tenant, except when done pursuant to the procedure set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3.

Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent the lawful eviction of a tenant by appropriate legal authorities, nor shall anything in this subdivision apply to occupancies defined by subdivision (b) of
Section 1940.

(c) Any landlord who violates this section shall be liable to the tenant in a civil action for all of the following:

(1) Actual damages of the tenant.

(2) An amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day or part thereof the landlord remains in violation of this section. In determining the amount of such award, the court shall consider proof of such matters as justice may require; however, in no event shall less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) be awarded for each separate cause of action. Subsequent or repeated violations, which are not committed contemporaneously with the initial violation, shall be treated as separate causes of action and shall be subject to a separate award of damages.

(d) In any action under
subdivision (c) the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party. In any such action the tenant may seek appropriate injunctive relief to prevent continuing or further violation of the provisions of this section during the pendency of the action. The remedy provided by this section is not exclusive and shall not preclude the tenant from pursuing any other remedy which the tenant may have under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

790.

After such notice has been served, and the period specified by such notice has expired, but not before, the landlord may reënter, or proceed according to law to recover possession.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

791.

Whenever the right of reentry is given to a grantor or a lessor in any grant or lease or otherwise, such reentry may be made at any time after the right has accrued, upon three days’ notice, as provided in sections 1161 and 1162, Code of Civil Procedure; provided, however, that the said three days’ notice shall not be required in cases where the hiring of real property is for a term not specified by the parties and where such hiring was terminated under and in accordance with the provisions of section 1946 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1931, Ch. 1033.)
-------------------------------------------

792.

Summary proceedings for obtaining possession of real property forcibly entered, or forcibly and unlawfully detained, are provided for in Sections 1159 to 1175, both inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

793.

An action for the possession of real property leased or granted, with a right of re-entry, may be maintained at any time, after the right to re-enter has accrued, without the notice prescribed in section seven hundred and ninety-one.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Mobilehome Residency Law [798. - 799.13.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [798. - 798.14.]

798.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mobilehome Residency Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 958, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

798.1.

Unless the provisions or context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

798.2.

“Management” means the owner of a mobilehome park or an agent or representative authorized to act on his behalf in connection with matters relating to a tenancy in the park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

798.3.

(a) “Mobilehome” is a structure designed for human habitation and for being moved on a street or highway under permit pursuant to Section 35790 of the Vehicle Code. Mobilehome includes a manufactured home, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, and a mobilehome, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, but, except as provided in subdivision (b), does not include a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 799.29 of this code and Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code or a commercial coach as
 defined in Section 18001.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Mobilehome,” for purposes of this chapter, other than Section 798.73, also includes trailers and other recreational vehicles of all types defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, other than motor homes, truck campers, and camping trailers, which are used for human habitation if the occupancy criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2), as follows, are met:

(1) The trailer or other recreational vehicle occupies a mobilehome site in the park, on November 15, 1992, under a rental agreement with a term of one month or longer, and the trailer or other recreational vehicle occupied a mobilehome site in the park prior to January 1, 1991.

(2) The trailer or other recreational vehicle occupies a mobilehome site in the park for nine or more continuous
 months commencing on or after November 15, 1992.

“Mobilehome” does not include a trailer or other recreational vehicle located in a recreational vehicle park subject to Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 799.20).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

798.4.

“Mobilehome park” is an area of land where two or more mobilehome sites are rented, or held out for rent, to accommodate mobilehomes used for human habitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

798.6.

“Park” is a manufactured housing community as defined in Section 18210.7 of the Health and Safety Code, or a mobilehome park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

798.7.

(a) “New construction” means any newly constructed spaces initially held out for rent after January 1, 1990. A mobilehome park space shall be considered “initially held out for rent” on the date of issuance of a permit or certificate of occupancy for that space by the enforcement agency in accordance with Section 18551 or 18613 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “New mobilehome park construction” means all spaces contained in a newly constructed mobilehome park for which a permit to operate is first issued by the enforcement agency on or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 666, Sec. 1.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

798.8.

“Rental agreement” is an agreement between the management and the homeowner establishing the terms and conditions of a park tenancy. A lease is a rental agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1397, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

798.9.

“Homeowner” is a person who has a tenancy in a mobilehome park under a rental agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1397, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

798.10.

“Change of use” means a use of the park for a purpose other than the rental, or the holding out for rent, of two or more mobilehome sites to accommodate mobilehomes used for human habitation, and does not mean the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a park rule or regulation. A change of use may affect an entire park or any portion thereof. “Change of use” includes, but is not limited to, a change of the park or any portion thereof to a condominium, stock cooperative, planned unit development, or any form of ownership wherein spaces within the park are to be sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

798.11.

“Resident” is a homeowner or other person who lawfully occupies a mobilehome.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1397, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

798.12.

“Tenancy” is the right of a homeowner to the use of a site within a mobilehome park on which to locate, maintain, and occupy a mobilehome, site improvements, and accessory structures for human habitation, including the use of the services and facilities of the park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1397, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

798.13.

(a) This chapter does not apply to any area owned, operated, or maintained by the state for the purpose of providing employee housing or space for a mobilehome owned or occupied by an employee of the state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a state employer shall provide the occupant of a privately owned mobilehome that is situated in an employee housing area owned, operated, or maintained by the state, and that is occupied by a state employee by agreement with his or
 her state employer and subject to the terms and conditions of that state employment, with a minimum of 60-days’ notice prior to terminating the tenancy for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

798.14.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “affirmative, written consent” means express written consent obtained separately from, and not contained in, any lease or rental agreement and that is not a condition of the tenancy.

(b) Unless otherwise provided, all notices required by this chapter shall be either delivered personally to the homeowner and resident, or deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the homeowner and resident at their site within the mobilehome park.

(c) All notices required by
 subdivisions (c) and (i) of Section 798.15 and by Section 798.43.1 to be delivered prior to February 1 of each year may be combined in one notice that contains all the information required by the sections under which the notices are given, and may be delivered to the
 homeowner and resident by electronic mail if the homeowner or resident has provided affirmative, written consent that clearly and conspicuously states that the homeowner or resident agrees to receive notices by electronic mail and includes the address to which the notices may be sent.

(d) A homeowner or resident’s affirmative, written consent to receive notices by electronic mail pursuant to subdivision (c) may be revoked by the homeowner or resident at any time, without any fee, charge, or penalty, and without any impact on the terms of the homeowner or resident’s tenancy. A
 homeowner’s or resident’s revocation shall be honored so long as it is in writing and indicates the intention of the homeowner or resident to no longer receive notices by electronic mail.

(e) (1) All management who obtains the affirmative, written consent of a homeowner or resident to receive notices by electronic mail pursuant to subdivision (c)
 shall, within five days, deliver personally or by mail to each homeowner or resident who gives consent the following notice, in English and any language set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632 used as the primary language during the negotiation of the rental agreement, in a clear and conspicuous manner, in at least 10-point Arial equivalent type:

“You have agreed to receive only electronic copies of notices that your mobilehome park management is required to send you by law. This means that you may not receive important notices on your door or in the mail. You may revoke this agreement, without any penalty or obligation, at any time. To revoke this agreement, send a written notice to your management that states that you no longer agree to receive electronic notices.”

(2) The
 notice described in paragraph (1) shall include the name and address of the entity to whom the homeowner or resident may deliver revocation of affirmative, written consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 339, Sec. 1.   (AB 391)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rental Agreement [798.15. - 798.22.]

798.15.

The rental agreement shall be in writing and shall contain, in addition to the provisions otherwise required by law to be included, all of the following:

(a) The term of the tenancy and the rent therefor.

(b) The rules and regulations of the park.

(c) A copy of the text of this chapter shall be provided as an exhibit and shall be incorporated into the rental agreement by reference. Management shall do one of the following prior to February 1 of each year, if a significant change was made in this chapter by legislation enacted in the prior year:

(1) Provide all homeowners with a copy of this
 chapter.

(2) Provide written notice to all homeowners that there has been a change to this chapter and that they may obtain one copy of this chapter from management at no charge. Management shall provide a copy within a reasonable time, not to exceed seven days, upon request.

(d) A provision specifying that (1) it is the responsibility of the management to provide and maintain physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order and condition and (2) with respect to a sudden or unforeseeable breakdown or deterioration of these improvements, the management shall have a reasonable period of time to repair the sudden or unforeseeable breakdown or deterioration and bring the improvements into good working order and condition after management knows or should have known of the breakdown or deterioration. For purposes of this subdivision, a reasonable period of time to
 repair a sudden or unforeseeable breakdown or deterioration shall be as soon as possible in situations affecting a health or safety condition, and shall not exceed 30 days in any other case except where exigent circumstances justify a delay.

(e) A description of the physical improvements to be provided the homeowner during the homeowner’s tenancy.

(f) A provision listing those services which will be provided at the time the rental agreement is executed and will continue to be offered for the term of tenancy and the fees, if any, to be charged for those services.

(g) A provision stating that management may charge a
 reasonable fee for services relating to the maintenance of the land and premises upon which a mobilehome is situated in the event the homeowner fails to maintain the land or premises in accordance with the rules and regulations of the park after written notification to the homeowner and the failure of the homeowner to comply within 14 days. The written notice shall state the specific condition to be corrected and an estimate of the charges to be imposed by management if the services are performed by management or its agent.

(h) All other provisions governing the tenancy.

(i) A copy of the following notice. Management shall also, prior to February 1 of each year, provide a copy of the following notice to all homeowners:IMPORTANT NOTICE TO ALL MANUFACTURED HOME/MOBILEHOME OWNERS: CALIFORNIA LAW REQUIRES THAT YOU BE MADE
 AWARE OF THE FOLLOWING:The Mobilehome Residency Law (MRL), found in Section 798 et seq. of the Civil Code, establishes the rights and responsibilities of homeowners and park management. The MRL is deemed a part of the terms of any park rental agreement or lease. This notice is intended to provide you with a general awareness of selected parts of the MRL and other important laws. It does not serve as a legal explanation or interpretation. For authoritative information, you must read and understand the laws. These laws change from time to time. In any year in which the law has changed, you may obtain one copy of the full text of the law from management at no charge. This notice is required by Civil Code Section 798.15(i) and the information provided may not be current.Homeowners and park management have certain rights and responsibilities
 under the MRL. These include, but are not limited to:1.Management must give a homeowner written notice of any increase in the rent at least 90 days before the date of the increase. (Civil Code Section 798.30)2.No rental or sales agreement may contain a provision by which a purchaser or a homeowner waives any of their rights under the MRL. (Civil Code Sections 798.19, 798.77)3.Management may not terminate or refuse to renew a homeowner’s tenancy except for one or more of the authorized reasons set forth in the MRL. (Civil Code Sections 798.55, 798.56) Homeowners must pay rent, utility charges, and reasonable incidental service charges in a timely manner. Failure to comply could be grounds for eviction from the park. (Civil Code Section 798.56)4.Homeowners, residents, and their guests must comply with the rental agreement or lease, including the reasonable rules and regulations of the park and all applicable local ordinances and state laws and regulations relating to mobilehomes. Failure to comply could be grounds for eviction from the park. (Civil Code Section 798.56)5.Homeowners have a right to peacefully assemble and freely communicate
 with respect to mobilehome living and for social or educational purposes. Homeowners have a right to meet in the park, at reasonable hours and in a reasonable manner, for any lawful purpose. Homeowners may not be charged a cleaning deposit in order to use the park clubhouse for meetings of resident organizations or for other lawful purposes, such as to hear from political candidates, so long as a homeowner of the park is hosting the meeting and all park residents are allowed to attend. Homeowners may not be required to obtain liability insurance in order to use common facilities unless alcohol is served. (Civil Code Sections 798.50, 798.51)6.If a home complies with certain standards, the homeowner is entitled to sell it in place in the park. If you sell your home, you are required to provide a manufactured home and mobilehome transfer disclosure statement to the buyer prior to sale. (Civil Code Section 1102.6d) When a home
 is sold, the owner is required to transfer the title to the buyer. The sale of the home is not complete until you receive the title from the seller. It is the responsibility of the buyer to also file paperwork with the Department of Housing and Community Development to register the home in the buyer’s name. (Civil Code Sections 798.70–798.74)7.Management has the right to enter the space upon which a mobilehome is situated for maintenance of utilities, trees, and driveways; for inspection and maintenance of the space in accordance with the rules and regulations of the park when the homeowner or resident fails to maintain the space; and for protection and maintenance of the mobilehome park at any reasonable time,
 but not in a manner or at a time that would interfere with the resident’s quiet enjoyment of the resident’s home. (Civil Code Section 798.26)8.A homeowner may not make any improvements or alterations to the homeowner’s space or home without following the rules and regulations of the park and all applicable local ordinances and state laws and regulations, which may include obtaining a permit to construct, and, if required by park rules or the rental agreement, without prior written approval of management. Failure
 to comply could be grounds for eviction from the park. (Civil Code Section 798.56)9.In California, mobilehome owners must pay annual property tax to the county tax collector or an annual fee in lieu of taxes to the Department of Housing and Community Development (HCD). If you are unsure which to pay, contact HCD. Failure to pay taxes or in lieu fees can have serious consequences, including losing your home at a tax sale.10.For more information on registration, titling, and taxes, contact: the Department of Housing and Community Development at www.hcd.ca.gov (800) 952-8356; your County Tax Collector; or call your local county government.11.The Mobilehome Residency Law Protection Program (MRLPP), found in Section 18800 et seq. of the Health and Safety Code, protects and safeguards mobilehome homeowners and residents by affording them an additional avenue to enforce violations of the MRL. The Department of Housing and Community Development (HCD) administers the program by providing assistance in taking complaints and helping to resolve and coordinate the resolution of those complaints from homeowners and residents relating to the MRL. The HCD contracts with nonprofit legal service providers and refers complaints of alleged MRL violations to these legal service providers. The HCD may not arbitrate, mediate, negotiate, or provide legal advice in connection with mobilehome park rent disputes, lease or rental agreements, or disputes arising from lease or rental agreements, but
 may provide information on these issues to the complaining party, management, or other responsible party. The MRLPP is funded by an annual registration fee of $10.00 for each permitted mobilehome lot, collected from management, which management may pass on and collect from the homeowner at the time of rent payment. The annual MRLPP registration fee must appear as a separate line item on the rent bill and be accompanied by a clear written description of the purposes of the charge, along with contact information for the HCD. For questions regarding the fee or the MRLPP, contact: the HCD at MHAssistance@hcd.ca.gov or by calling (800) 952-8356.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   (AB 2399)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

798.16.

(a) The rental agreement may include other provisions permitted by law, but need not include specific language contained in state or local laws not a part of this chapter.

(b) Management shall return an executed copy of the rental agreement to the homeowner within 15 business days after management has received the rental agreement signed by the homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

798.18.
